Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-154
Judges; removal; grounds.

Any judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court may be removed in the same manner and for the same causes as a judge of the district court may be removed.

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 3, p. 189;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-164;

R.S.1943, § 48-154;

Laws 1967, c. 292, § 3, p. 798;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 83.